fi: Kosteudenpoistimen täyttötapa: Pussi; Koruhelmet; Lohko; Kasetti; Kristallit; Geeli; Rakeet; Pakkaus; Pussi; Jauhe; Arkki; Tabletti; Muu
sk-SK: Forma náplne do odvlhčovača: Taška; Korálky; Blok; Náplň; Kryštály; Gél; Granule; Balík; Vrecúško; Prášok; Hárok; Tableta; Iné
vi: Dạng nạp lại của máy hút ẩm: Túi; Hạt tròn; Khối; Hộp; Pha lê; Gel; Hạt nhỏ; Gói; Túi; Bột; Tờ; Viên nén; Khác
tr: Nem alıcı dolum formu: Poşet; Boncuk; Blok; Kartuş; Kristal; Jel; Granüller; Paket; Kese; Toz; Tabaka; Tablet; Diğer
hr-HR: Oblik punjenja za odvlaživače zraka: Vrećica; Perle; Blok; Uložak; Kristali; Gel; Granule; Paket; Ambalažna vrećica; Puder; Sheet; Tablet; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบน้ำยาเติมเครื่องลดความชื้น: ถุง; ลูกปัด; บล็อก; ตลับ; คริสตัล; เจล; เม็ดเล็ก; ซองสำเร็จรูป; ซอง; แบบผง; แบบแผ่น; แท็บเล็ต; อื่นๆ
el: Μορφή αναπλήρωσης αφυγραντήρα: Σακούλα; Χάντρες; Μπλοκ; Κασέτα; Κρύσταλλοι; Τζελ; Κόκκοι; Φακελάκι; Θήκη; Σκόνη; Φύλλο; Ταμπλέτα; Άλλο
it: Forma della ricarica del deumidificatore: Borsa; Perline; Blocco; Cartuccia; Cristalli; Gel; Granuli; Bustina; Borsa; Polvere; Foglio; Tablet; Altro
da: Affugters påfyldningsform: Taske; Perler; Blok; Patron; Krystaller; Gel; Granulater; Pakke; Pose; Pulver; Ark; Tablet; Andet
ja: 除湿器リフィルフォーム: 袋; ビーズ; ブロック; カートリッジ; クリスタル; ゲル; 顆粒; パケット; ポーチ; パウダー; シート; タブレット; その他
pt-PT: Formato de recarga do desumidificador: Saco; Esferas; Bloco; Cartuchos; Cristais; Gel; Granulados; Pacote; Bolsa; Pó; Folha; Comprimido; Outro
en: Dehumidifier refill form: Bag; Beads; Block; Cartridge; Crystals; Gel; Granules; Packet; Pouch; Powder; Sheet; Tablet; Other
pt-BR: Forma de recarga do desumidificador: Bolsa; Contas; Bloco; Cartucho; Cristais; Gel; Grãos; Sachê; Estojo; Pó; Folha; Tablet; Outro
bg-BG: Форма за попълване на влагоуловител: Пакетче; Малки топчета; Блокче; Касета; Кристали; Гел; Гранули; Пакетче; Малка торбичка; Пудра; Лист; Таблетка; Друго
ro-RO: Forma rezervei pentru dezumidificator: Pungă; Bile; Bloc; Cartuș; Cristale; Gel; Granule; Pachet; Săculeț; Pudră; Foaie; Tabletă; Altele
nb: Påfyllingsform for avfukter: Bag; Perler; Blokk; Patron; Krystaller; Gel; Granulat; Pakke; Pose; Pulver; Ark; Nettbrett; Annet
ko: 제습기 리필 형태: 가방; 비즈; 블록; 카트리지; 결정형; 젤; 과립; 팩; 파우치; 가루; 시트; 정제; 기타
hu: Páramentesítő utántöltő típusa: Táska; Gyöngyök; Tömb; Patron; Kristályok; Gél; Granulátum; Tasak; Tasak; Por; Lap; Tabletta; Egyéb
cs: Forma náplně do odvlhčovače: Sáček; Kuličky; Blok; Kazeta; Krystaly; Gel; Granule; Balení; Kapsa; Prášek; List; Tableta; Jiné
pl: Forma wkładu do osuszacza: Worek; Kulki; Blok; Wkład filtracyjny; Kryształki; Żel; Granulat; Saszetka; Woreczek; Proszek; Arkusz; Tabletka; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 除湿机补充剂形式: 袋装; 珠状; 块状; 滤芯; 晶体; 凝胶; 颗粒; 小包装; 小袋装; 粉末; 片状; 片剂; 其他
ru: Форма сменного наполнителя для осушителя: Мешок; Шарики; Блок; Картридж; Кристаллы; Гель; Гранулы; Пакетик; Мешочек; Порошок; Лист; Таблетка; Другое
lt-LT: Drėgmės surinkėjo papildymo forma: Krepšelis; Karoliukai; Kvadratas; Kasetė; Kristalai; Gelis; Granulės; Pakelis; Maišelis; Milteliai; Lakštai; Tabletė; Kita
fr: Format de la recharge du déshumidificateur: Sac; Perles; Bloc; Cartouche; Cristaux; Gel; Granulés; Sachet; Pochette; Poudre; Feuille; Tablette; Autre
nl: Navulvorm luchtontvochtiger: Tas; Kralen; Blok; Inktpatroon; Kristallen; Gel; Korrels; Navulverpakking; Zakje; Poeder; Blad; Tablet; Overig
sv: Form på avfuktningspåfyllning: Väska; Kulor; Block; Patron; Kristaller; Gel; Granulat; Paket; Påse; Pulver; Ark; Surfplatta; Övrigt
zh-TW: 除濕劑補充形式: 袋裝; 珠狀; 塊狀; 匣狀; 水晶狀; 凝膠; 顆粒狀; 補充包; 補充袋; 粉末狀; 片狀; 藥片狀; 其他
de: Form von Nachfüllpackungen für Luftentfeuchter: Tasche; Perlen; Block; Kartusche; Kristalle; Gel; Granulat; Paket; Beutel; Puder; Blatt; Tablette; Sonstiges
es: Formulario de recarga del deshumidificador: Bolso; Cuentas y abalorios; Bloquear; Cartucho; Cristales; Gel; Gránulos; Paquete; Bolsa; Polvo; Hoja; Tableta; Otros
sl-SI: Oblika nadomestnega polnila za razvlaževalnik zraka: Vreča; Biseri; Kocka; Kartuša; Kristali; Gel; Granule; Vrečka; Torbica; Prašek; Blago; Tablični računalnik; Druga